North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Withdrawal.

§ 55A-15-20.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State shall not withdraw from this State until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

A foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

That it is not conducting affairs in this State and that it surrenders its authority to conduct affairs in this State;

That the corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of affairs conducted in this State, during the time the corporation was authorized to conduct affairs in this State may thereafter be made on such corporation by service thereof on the Secretary of State;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (3) of this subsection; and

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the application conforms to law, the Secretary of State shall:

Endorse on the application and an exact or conformed copy thereof the word “filed”, and the hour, day, month, and year of the filing thereof;

File the application in the Secretary of State’s office;

Issue a certificate of withdrawal to which the Secretary of State shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application; and

Send to the foreign corporation or its representative the certificate of withdrawal together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 55A-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the foreign corporation at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 400, s. 9; 2001-387, ss. 44, 45.

§ 55A-15-21.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation by reason of a merger, consolidation, or conversion.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State ceases its separate existence as a result of a statutory merger or consolidation permitted by the laws of the state or country under which it was incorporated, or converts into another entity as permitted by those laws, the surviving or resulting entity shall apply for a certificate of withdrawal for the foreign corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, or conversion or a certificate reciting the facts of the merger, consolidation, or conversion duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under the laws of which the foreign corporation was incorporated. If the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to conduct affairs or transact business in this State, the articles or certificate shall be accompanied by an application which must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State, the type of entity and the name of the surviving or resulting entity, and a statement that the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to conduct affairs or transact business in this State;

A statement that the surviving or resulting entity consents that service of process based upon any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of affairs conducted in this State, during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to conduct affairs in this State may thereafter be made by service thereof on the Secretary of State;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (a)(2) of this section; and

A commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, conform to law the Secretary of State shall:

Endorse on the articles or certificate and the application for withdrawal, if required, the word “filed”, and the hour, day, month, and year of filing thereof;

File the articles or certificate and the application, if required;

Issue a certificate of withdrawal; and

Send to the surviving or resulting entity or its representative the certificate of withdrawal, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application, if required, affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 55A-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the foreign corporation at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1999-369, s. 2.8; 2001-387, ss. 46, 47; 2001-487, s. 62(g).

§§ 55A-15-22 through 55A-15-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.